da: Kiropraktorborddesign: Dekompression; Drop; Elevation; Fleksion-distraktion; Hylo; Andet
lt-LT: Chiropraktinio stalo konstrukcija: Dekompresinis; Nuleidžiamas; Pakeliamas; Fiksacija-distrakcija; Reguliuojamo aukščio; Kita
sl-SI: Zasnova mize za kiropraktiko: Dekompresija; Spust; Dvig; Fleksijsko-distrakcijska; Hylo; Drugo
fr: Conception de table de chiropratique: Décompression; Diminué; Élévation; Flexion-distraction; Hylo; Autre
sv: Utformning av kiropraktikbord: Dekompression; Sänkning; Elevation; Flexion-distraktion# #; Hylo; Övrigt
tr: Kayropraktik masa tasarımı: Dekompresyon; Drop; Yükseltme; Fleksiyon-distraksiyon; Hylo; Diğer
vi: Thiết kế bàn nắn khớp: Giảm bớt sức ép; Độ giảm; Độ cao; Phân tâm uốn cong; Hylo; Khác
ko: 척추교정 테이블 디자인: 감압; 드롭; 승하강; 굴곡-신연; Hylo; 기타
de: Design des Chiropraktiktisches: Dekompression; Drop; Elevation; Flexion-Distraktion; Hylo; Sonstiges
ru: Конструкция стола для мануальной терапии: Декомпрессия; Падение; Подъем; Сгибание-дистракция; Хило; Другое
th: การออกแบบโต๊ะสำหรับการบำบัดโรคโดยวิธีการจับกระดูกสันหลัง: การลดแรงอัดดัน; ดรอปสาย; ระดับความสูง; แบบงอและดึง; แบบฮายโล; อื่นๆ
el: Σχεδιασμός τραπεζιού χειροπρακτικής: Αποσυμπίεση; Βαρύτητας; Ανύψωση; Κάμψη-μεταρσίωση; Hylo; Άλλο
it: Design del lettino da chiropratica: Decompressione; Drop; Elevazione; Flessione-distrazione; Hylo; Altro
ro-RO: Design mese osteopatie: Decompresie; Sistem drop; Ridicare; Flexie-extensie; Hylo; Altele
nb: Design av kiropraktikkbord: Dekompresjon; Slipp; Høyde; Fleksjon-distraksjon; Hylo; Annet
es: Diseño de mesa quiropráctica: Descompresión; Caída; Elevación; Flexion-distracción; Hylo; Otros
zh-TW: 整脊治療床設計: 減壓; 下降; 高度; 彎曲伸展型骨折; 海洛; 其他
fi: Kiropraktikon pöydän muotoilu: Dekompressio; Pudotus; Kohoasento; Koukistushäiriö; Hylo; Muu
pl: Projekt stołu do chiropraktyki: Dekompresja; Spadek; Wysokość; Rozproszenie zgięcia; Hylo; Inne
pt-BR: Formato da mesa de quiropraxia: Descompressão; Queda; Elevação; Flexão-distração; Hylo; Outro
cs: Konstrukce chiropraktického stolu: Dekompresní; Podladění; Zvedací; Flekčně-distrakční; Hylo; Jiné
sk-SK: Dizajn masážneho stola: Dekompresia; Slza; Výška; Flexia-rozptyľovanie; Hylo; Iné
nl: Ontwerp chiropractortafel: Decompressie; Drop; Verhoging; Flexie-distractie; Hylo; Andere
ja: カイロプラクティック施術台の種類: 減圧; ドロップ; 挙上; 屈曲牽引; ハイロー; その他
hr-HR: Dizajn kiropraktičarskog stola: Dekompresija; Pad; Uzvišenje; Fleksija-distrakcija; Hylo; Ostalo
bg-BG: Дизайн на маса за хиропрактика: Декомпресия; Спускане; Издигане; Флексия и дистракция; Хайло; Други
pt-PT: Design de mesa quiroprática: Descompressão; Comprimento da cortina; Elevação; Flexão-distração; Hilo; Outro
en: Chiropractic table design: Decompression; Drop; Elevation; Flexion-distraction; Hylo; Other
hu: Kiropraktőrágy kialakítása: Dekompresszió; Lehajtható; Felemelhető; Hajlítható-széthúzható; Manuálterápiás; Egyéb
zh-CN: 脊椎按摩床设计: 减压; 降调; 抬高; 屈曲牵引; Hylo; 其他